furlan.dic
Francesc/l
Tolomeu/i
Valentin/e
abonament/ab
abìs/a
acetât/af
acrobatic/ae
acuarel/ac
adiacent/ae
adoradôr/ag
adriatic/ae
aeronavâl/ah
afan/ab
agarûl/an
agnul/ae
agradît/af
aiudant/ab
alberghîr/ao
alchilic/ae
alessandrin/ae
alpinistic/ae
amatoriâl/ah
ambassadôr/ag
amonît/ab
amorâl/ah
amorôs/af
anaforic/ae
ancjetant/g
andament/ab
angul/ac
animosetât/b
antecedent/ae
antidemocratic/ae
antifassist/ag
antirivoluzionari/ae
anuâl/ah
apalt/ab
apel/ac
aprossimatîf/af
aragonês/af
architetonic/ae
ardimentôs/af
armelinâr/ab
arment/ae
armentâr/am
ars/af
artist/ag
arzilôs/af
assetic/ae
assiâl/ah
astrat/ae
astronom/ae
atenuatîf/af
ateu/ia
atomic/ae
augûr/ab
ausiliâr/am
australian/ae
autocontrol/ac
autograf/abe
automobilist/ag
autostop/ab
avignî/abN
avoiâl/ah
babilonês/f
babio/i
bacil/c
baldance/b
balonîr/m
banchîr/o
bancjîr/o
banducel/e
bandâr/m
barbonçâl/c
bastalami/h
bastonadôr/bg
bataìce/b
batel/c
bausâr/m
becjâr/m
benevul/e
benzinâr/m
beolc/l
berghel/c
bibiôs/f
bifolc/l
bilietinâr/m
bilietâr/m
bimotôr/b
bionic/e
bipôl/c
blanc/bl
blu/d
bonât/bf
boreâl/c
bovadice/b
bovin/e
boâr/m
bradasc/l
braçolâr/m
broili/d
brombul/c
bronchiâl/h
brusc/bl
bucanîr/o
budist/g
bulo/i
bumbuie/b
bust/c
buteghîr/p
butegâr/m
buzaron/e
calf/bf
cali/c
camisete/b
campagnûl/n
canonîr/o
cantonîr/o
capitel/c
capuçat/e
carabinîr/o
carnavâl/c
carocîr/o
cartelin/b
cartolâr/m
cassîr/o
catanzarês/f
catasticâl/h
caustic/e
cavalaresc/l
censôr/g
cereâl/c
ceri/b
cerimonîr/o
cervicâl/hb
ciert/e
cinisâr/bm
circul/c
citofon/b
civilist/g
cjaliâr/m
cjalçât/f
cjampanâr/m
cjampâr/m
cjanin/e
cjapitul/c
cjartolâr/m
cjaruç/b
cjavidiel/c
cjavrâr/m
cjiadôr/g
clopant/e
codarûl/n
codin/b
cognossitîf/f
cogul/c
colaçâr/m
colegjâl/h
colono/i
colpevulist/g
complasent/e
complicance/b
comunâl/h
comutîf/f
concuistadôr/g
condizionâl/hc
coniugâl/h
conservatori/be
consum/b
contestadôr/g
conturbât/f
cordul/c
corean/be
coregjonâl/h
cortinari/b
cortês/f
corîr/o
costîr/o
cramâr/m
creadôr/g
crepon/e
cristal/c
croste/b
crudêl/h
cudurûl/c
cuintribandîr/o
cuintrimissilistic/e
cuozient/b
curadôr/g
curtîl/c
cusinîr/o
cussienciôs/f
dadul/c
daziâr/m
defont/e
demagogjie/b
demaniâl/h
dermatolic/g
deventant/e
digjitâl/h
dignitôs/f
dinamicitât/b
dindi/e
dislassât/f
dislivel/c
dispriesi/b
distiladôr/g
distracât/f
doganîr/o
dominant/e
dopli/hb
dotorât/b
drâc/g
ebraic/ae
ebreu/ia
edificabil/ae
editoriâl/ah
eletorât/ab
eletricist/ag
elocuent/ae
eminent/ae
emolient/abe
empedocleu/ia
endemisim/ab
entusiastât/af
epigjeu/ia
episcopâl/ah
episodi/ab
epiteli/ac
erbarûl/an
esagon/ab
esit/ab
esploradôr/ag
essenzialitât/b
essenziâl/ah
estremistic/ae
eterosessuâl/ah
etilen/ab
euclideu/ia
europeu/ia
evaporadôr/ab
famôs/f
fassut/b
fasuli/c
fatôr/g
federâl/h
ferovîr/o
figurant/e
filibustîr/o
filiâl/hb
filosofie/b
financîr/o
finâl/hcb
flac/l
flamant/f
fondamentâl/h
foradorie/b
forestîr/o
fornâr/m
fosc/l
fossil/ce
franc/bl
fresc/l
friabil/e
frombolîr/o
frust/cg
frutarûl/c
fruçon/b
furbo/i
furmiâr/m
fusilîr/o
fusât/f
fîl/c
galiformi/h
garze/b
gjal/c
gjalinâr/bm
gjeopolitic/e
gjestôr/g
gjigantesc/l
gjigjo/i
gjo/d
gjornalâr/m
glaciâl/h
glaçadôr/b
gnogno/i
gnoçâr/m
gol/c
golôs/f
gravitazion/b
gri/d
grinti/h
grotesc/l
grumâl/c
idealist/ag
idric/ae
idrocarbûr/ab
ilustri/ah
imbecîl/ah
imberlât/af
imbotonât/af
imeni/ab
imobil/ace
impassibil/ae
implacabil/ae
implombât/af
impressionist/ag
impreteribil/ae
incaricât/af
incidentâl/ah
incoerent/ae
incomparabil/ae
incrosadure/b
incursôr/ag
indecîs/af
individui/ah
inesauribil/ae
infermîr/ao
infernâl/ah
influent/ae
infolcjât/af
infurmiât/af
ingjanadôr/ag
ingolosiment/ab
inizi/ab
inscuelament/ab
inscuelât/af
insiliôs/af
institût/ab
inteletuâl/ahc
interpersonâl/ah
intric/ab
introdutîf/af
inusuâl/ah
invernâl/ah
investidôr/ag
investiment/ab
invuaribil/ae
ipertest/ac
ipogjeu/aib
iritabil/ae
jaguâr/g
jerbarûl/n
jugoslâf/f
lacrimâl/h
lampant/e
latâr/m
leadôr/g
legri/h
lengonat/b
li/d
librâr/m
lic/l
ligulât/f
locâl/hc
lofio/i
lubrificant/be
ludro/i
machinist/g
magjistrâl/h
malcreât/f
malformazion/b
malvignût/f
manecul/c
maoist/g
marclàs/e
marmulâr/m
marsupiâl/h
marçâr/m
massâr/m
matinîr/p
maçarûl/c
mediocri/h
menadôr/g
meridian/be
mesozoic/e
messazîr/p
micidiâl/h
minorât/f
mocul/ce
modest/g
modâl/h
mol/ce
molec/bl
montagnûl/n
moro/i
moschetîr/o
mostro/i
mote/b
motâr/m
mucjo/i
mugnestri/h
mulinâr/m
muradôr/g
muribont/f
mussin/e
mâl/ce
nasadôr/g
nasic/l
nasâl/h
nibli/h
nodâr/m
nono/i
nulât/bf
numar/b
nuti/h
oceanic/ae
oculistic/ae
omosessuâl/ah
onest/ag
operari/ae
orcul/ac
orloiâr/am
ornât/af
ortogonâl/ah
ossessîf/af
otim/ae
otimist/ag
paiasso/i
paiesc/l
palatâl/h
pan/b
panatîr/o
pandolo/i
panetîr/o
partenopeu/i
paruchîr/o
pascâl/h
passazîr/p
passizîr/p
past/c
pastrocj/e
patinadôr/g
patriziât/f
pegri/h
peleâr/m
peliçâr/m
persuasion/b
pescjarili/c
petenadôr/g
petrarchesc/l
petrolîr/o
peçotâr/m
picinin/e
picât/f
piferâr/m
piorâr/m
piruchîr/o
pistil/c
plateâl/h
plaçarûl/n
poie/b
pompîr/o
porcjâr/m
portinâr/m
portonîr/o
portîr/o
possent/be
postâl/h
postîr/m
preambul/c
precetôr/g
predicatîf/bf
presonîr/p
prestadôr/g
pretesâr/m
primarûl/n
pro/d
prodîr/o
profitadôr/g
profonditât/b
proporzionâl/h
prospetîf/f
protezionistic/e
puartadôr/g
puartinâr/m
puartîr/o
puestâr/m
pul/c
rassegnazion/b
re/d
reagjibil/e
realist/g
residenziâl/h
resinât/f
resonîr/o
restauradôr/g
reu/i
ric/l
rimadôr/g
rimessâr/m
rimessîr/p
rinassiment/b
ringhespîl/c
ritês/f
rogatari/e
romagnûl/n
romanzîr/o
rosarûl/n
rusignûl/n
rôl/c
sagre/b
sagrât/bf
saldadôr/g
salubri/h
sardegnûl/n
sbacjo/i
sbilf/e
sbrindinât/f
scaletîr/p
scarpâr/m
schermidôr/g
schi/d
scjadiment/b
scjandul/c
scombuiât/f
scudielâr/m
scuelâr/m
scultôr/g
sec/bl
semafar/b
semisbrumât/f
semitic/e
sessagjesimâl/h
sest/cg
sevêr/g
sfi/d
sfredulîs/f
sgnaparûl/n
similâr/b
simulât/f
sintomatologjic/e
siôr/g
smorfeôs/f
sostanziâl/h
sotplan/b
sovenzionadôr/g
spagnûl/cn
spalet/e
spavit/f
spelorc/l
spi/d
sporc/l
sposadôr/g
srarît/f
stal/c
stalîr/o
stiele/b
stranîr/o
stratigrafic/e
straviât/f
straçarûl/n
stublau/i
studentesc/l
subalterni/h
sunadôr/g
supierp/f
supuest/c
sussistence/b
tabacâr/m
tacadiç/e
tanali/d
tarizât/f
te/d
tercerûl/n
terenâr/m
terminâl/hc
terorist/g
terôr/b
tetul/c
tibetan/e
todesc/l
tosc/l
tramessîr/p
trasformadôr/g
travaiôs/f
tridul/c
trivele/b
trombetîr/o
tumorâl/h
ubidient/ae
unmont/g
ustinât/af
ustîr/ap
usurâr/am
vacjâr/m
val/cb
vasc/l
vecjo/i
venturât/f
vergjin/e
vertiç/b
vicinâl/h
viticultôr/g
vivâl/c
vualîf/f
vueresc/l
vuerezîr/p
vuerilîr/o
vuerîr/m
zardinîr/o
zi/d
zirandul/e
zoielîr/o
zoo/b
zornadîr/p
zornalîr/o
çampâr/m
çarneli/c
